Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4363.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [604.135] TRESPASS OF INTANGIBLE PARTICULATE MATTER. new text end new text begin (a) A person who causes the trespass of intangible particulate matter on the land of another person is liable for damages if that trespass interferes with the person in possession of the land's right to exclusive possession. For purposes of this section, "intangible particulate matter" means an airborne biological or chemical substance, including but not limited to pesticides and other pollutants. new text end new text begin (b) If the court finds that a trespass of intangible particulate matter has occurred, the court may award general and special damages, or a civil penalty, to the plaintiff in an amount of not more than $100 for each day there was an instance of intangible particulate matter trespass. The court may also award injunctive relief or other relief the court finds just and equitable. new text end